Wisconsin, session 2025, SB465.
do enact as follows:SB465,11Section 1. 16.75 (1p) of the statutes is repealed.SB465,22Section 2. 16.855 (1p) of the statutes is repealed.SB465,33Section 3. 66.0901 (1) (ae) of the statutes is repealed.SB465,44Section 4. 66.0901 (1) (am) of the statutes is repealed.SB465,55Section 5. 66.0901 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB465,2,17666.0901 (6) Separation of contracts; classification of contractors. In 7public contracts for the construction, repair, remodeling or improvement of a public 8building or structure, other than highway structures and facilities, a municipality 9may bid projects based on a single or multiple division of the work. Public contracts 10shall be awarded according to the division of work selected for bidding. Except as 11provided in sub. (6m), the The municipality may set out in any public contract 12reasonable and lawful conditions as to the hours of labor, wages, residence, 13character and classification of workers to be employed by any contractor, classify 14contractors as to their financial responsibility, competency and ability to perform 15work and set up a classified list of contractors. The municipality may reject the bid 16of any person, if the person has not been classified for the kind or amount of work in 17the bid.SB465,618Section 6. 66.0901 (6m) of the statutes is repealed.SB465,719Section 7. 66.0901 (6s) of the statutes is repealed.SB465,2,2020